District of Columbia statutes.
31-3111

Duties of Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor shall, within 120 days from February 28, 1987, issue rules to implement all sections of this chapter except § 31-3110. The Mayor shall issue rules to implement § 31-3110 no later than 5 years from February 28, 1987.

(b)

The Mayor shall provide the coverage and benefits set forth in this chapter to employees of the District and their dependents who are insured through the District of Columbia Employees’ Health Benefits Program. For District employees and their dependents who are insured through the Federal Employees’ Health Benefits Program, the Mayor shall provide supplemental coverage and benefits that comply with the requirements of this chapter no later than February 28, 1994.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-195, § 12, 34 DCR 491
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-192, § 2(d), 39 DCR 9007

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3106 and § 31-3109.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2311.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 6-195, “Drug Abuse, Alcohol Abuse, and Mental Illness Insurance Act of 1986.”, see Mayor’s Order 88-50, February 25, 1988.